Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
PRESIDENTIAL ELECTIONS

1-4-301. Time of holding presidential elections.

At the general election in 1984 and every fourth year thereafter, the number of presidential electors to which the state is entitled shall be elected.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 323, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 674, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-16-103 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-302. Party nominations to be made by convention.

Any convention of delegates of a political party or any committee authorized by resolution of the convention may nominate presidential electors.

All nominations for vacancies for presidential electors made by the convention or a committee authorized by the convention shall be certified by affidavit of the presiding officer and secretary of the convention or committee.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 323, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 675, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-107 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For methods of nomination, see §§ 1-4-502 and 1-4-503; for protests of designations and nominations, see § 1-4-909.

1-4-303. Nomination of unaffiliated candidates - fee. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 324, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 675, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 885, § 1, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 860, § 114, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1317, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 762, § 18, effective May 20.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1398, § 13, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1433, § 13, effective June 6.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1063, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 679, § 10, effective May 17.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3010, § 15, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1672, § 83, effective June 21.

1-4-304. Presidential electors.

The presidential electors shall convene at the capital of the state, in the office of the governor at the capitol building, on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in the first December following their election at the hour of 12 noon and take the oath required by law for presidential electors. If any vacancy occurs in the office of a presidential elector because of death, refusal to act, absence, or other cause, the presidential electors present shall immediately proceed to fill the vacancy in the electoral college. When all vacancies have been filled, the presidential electors shall proceed to perform the duties required of them by the constitution and laws of the United States. The vote for president and vice president shall be taken by open ballot.

The secretary of state shall give notice in writing to each of the presidential electors of the time and place of the meeting at least ten days prior to the meeting.

The secretary of state shall provide the presidential electors with the necessary blanks, forms, certificates, or other papers or documents required to enable them to properly perform their duties.

If desired, the presidential electors may have the advice of the attorney general of the state in regard to their official duties.

Each presidential elector shall vote for the presidential candidate and, by separate ballot, vice-presidential candidate who received the highest number of votes at the preceding general election in this state.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 324, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 675, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2001:

(5) amended, p. 1002, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-17-101 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-305. Compensation.

Every presidential elector of this state who attends and votes for those officers at the time and place appointed by law is entitled to receive the sum of five dollars per day for each day's attendance at the election and fifteen cents per mile for each mile traveled in going to and returning from the place where the electors meet, by the most usual route traveled, to be paid out of the general fund. The controller shall audit the amount and draw a warrant for the same.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 324, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 675, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-17-102 as it existed prior to 1980.